Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2206.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1322-B. P urchase of firearm detection technology. (a) Authorization.-- A school entity may, with the approval of the department, enter into a contract or other agreement with a vendor for the lease, purchase, installation, operation or maintenance of a firearm detection technology or other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the firearm detection technology.(b) Mandatory characteristics.--A firearm detection technology leased or purchased under this section shall:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Be capable of utilizing existing school security cameras or drones to monitor video feeds for any firearm brandished on school property or a school bus.(2) Possess the capacity to immediately and independently alert school personnel, first responders or other persons, as determined by the department or school entity, with minimal human oversight, if a firearm is detected on school property or a school bus.(3) Satisfy the definition of "qualified anti-terrorism technology" under 6 U.S.C. Ch. 1 Subch. VIII Pt. G (relating to support anti-terrorism by fostering effective technologies).(4) Have been developed in the United States without the use of any third-party or open-source data.(c) Management.--F irearm detection technology under this section may be managed directly by the vendor through a continuously monitored operations center that is staffed by analysts trained in detecting and identifying various types of firearms.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2206PN2899 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920